Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-622
Contraband; illegal possession; complaints and search warrants.

Whenever any conservation officer or other peace officer of the state has reason to believe that any person has in his or her possession any game, aquatic organisms, raw fur, nets, or devices contrary to law, the officer may file or cause to be filed a sworn complaint to such effect before any magistrate having jurisdiction and may procure a search warrant and execute such warrant.

Laws 1929, c. 112, VI, § 9, p. 435;

C.S.1929, § 37-609;

Laws 1941, c. 72, § 10, p. 306;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 37-609;

R.S.1943, § 37-609;

Laws 1961, c. 175, § 4, p. 524;

Laws 1988, LB 1030, § 38;

Laws 1994, LB 1165, § 13;

R.S.Supp.,1996, § 37-609;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 312;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 92.